North Carolina, session 2025, HB759.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) in nonrecurring
funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to provide a directed grant to Forsyth County to be used as
follows:
(1) To support the Family and Community Wellness Initiative by funding two
mobile units to provide essential health, social services, and nutritional
support to residents of Forsyth, Davidson, Davie, Guilford, Randolph, Stokes,
and Yadkin Counties.
(2) To establish a work-based learning parent program and service-learning
project for adult learners to enhance community engagement, economic
mobility, and support for families in need.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*H759-v-1*